Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
In General
§ 49-7-90.
Possession of paddlefish in violation of law or regulation; penalties; permits and fees.

Any person who takes or possesses a paddlefish or parts thereof, whether coming from within or from outside the state, in violation of law or regulation is guilty of a Class I violation and may be punished as provided in Section 49-7-141, and upon conviction, shall forfeit all hunting, trapping and fishing privileges and paddlefish permits for a period of not less than one (1) year from the date of conviction. A violator shall pay a reinstatement fee of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) to have his or her privileges restored.

The commission may promulgate rules and regulations, establish and issue permits and establish and collect fees for permits for the harvest and sale of paddlefish and paddlefish parts.

Any person engaged in selling or peddling nonnative fish taken from public waters must possess a commercial fishing license.

Any person required to purchase a commercial fishing license must report his catch and/or other activities as required by regulation of the commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 499, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 340, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 526, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 336, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 49-7-91.
Unlawful to fish commercially in Muddy Bayou.

It is unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to fish commercially at any time in Muddy Bayou, in Warren County, Mississippi.

The department may enforce this section and seize and confiscate all commercial nets and seines used in Muddy Bayou, in Warren County, Mississippi, or on any part of the bayou, either along the length or at its two (2) openings in and to Eagle Lake and Steele Bayou.

Any person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not less than Ten Dollars ($10.00), nor more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), or be imprisoned not more than three (3) months, or both; and in addition the department shall seize and confiscate all commercial nets and seines used for such purpose, and dispose of the same at private sale and place the proceeds to the credit of the State Game and Fish Fund.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5903-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 333, §§ 1-4; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 69, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-7-93.
Killing deer or spotted fawn out of season; penalties.

Any person convicted of intentionally killing any deer or spotted fawn out of season shall be fined not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00); and the commission shall have authority to revoke a license for a period of one (1) year.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5866-01; Laws, 1956, ch. 149, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 479, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 49-7-95.
Killing deer by headlighting or other lighting devices; killing livestock; harassment of wildlife; penalties.

Any person who hunts or takes or kills any deer at night by headlighting, by any lighting device or light amplifying device shall, upon conviction thereof, be guilty of a Class I violation and shall be punished as provided in Section 49-7-141.

For any person to be charged with a violation of this subsection, that person must have been observed committing an overt act consistent with the hunting of deer at night with the aid of a light, lighting device or light amplifying device. Such observation of an overt act may include, but shall not be limited to, witnessing the discharge of a weapon capable of killing a deer, hearing the report of a firearm being fired, seeing the person in possession of a recently killed deer which could not have been killed during legal hunting hours, or witnessing the person committing any acts consistent with headlighting deer in violation of this subsection.

Violators of subsection (1), twenty-one (21) years old or older, upon conviction, shall also forfeit all hunting, trapping and fishing privileges for a period of not less than three (3) consecutive years from the date of conviction and shall attend such courses prescribed by the commission. A violator shall pay a reinstatement fee of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) to have his privileges restored.

A person twenty-one (21) years old, or older, convicted of a first violation of subsection (1) may petition the commission to have his privileges restored after one (1) year from the date of his conviction. The commission may prescribe conditions on the restoration of privileges for a first-time offender, and the first-time offender shall pay a reinstatement fee of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00).

A violator of subsection (1) under the age of twenty-one (21), upon conviction, shall forfeit all hunting, trapping and fishing privileges for one (1) year from the date of conviction, and shall attend courses prescribed by the commission. A violator under the age of twenty-one (21) may petition the commission to have his privileges restored after he has paid his penalty. The violator shall pay a reinstatement fee of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) to have his privileges restored.

A person under the age of twenty-one (21) convicted of a second or subsequent violation of subsection (1) shall forfeit all hunting, trapping and fishing privileges for a period of not less than three (3) consecutive years from the date of conviction and shall attend courses prescribed by the commission. The person shall pay a reinstatement fee of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) to have his privileges restored.

A person who is appealing from a violation of subsection (1) shall have his hunting privileges suspended or revoked as provided in Section 49-7-27.

This section shall not apply to any deer killed in an accident with any motor vehicle.

Anyone found guilty of violating this section who shoots or kills any livestock shall be punished as provided in Section 97-41-15, in addition to the penalties provided in this section.

It shall be unlawful for a person to shine a light from a public road or right-of-way, or on the property of another, at night, from one-half (1/2) hour after sunset to one-half (1/2) hour before sunrise. This section shall not apply: (a) to the normal use of headlights of a vehicle traveling on a public road or right-of-way; (b) to law enforcement, emergency or utility personnel in the performance of their official duties; (c) to landowners, agricultural or hunting leaseholders or their designated agents with written authorization from the landowner or agricultural leaseholder, and upon lands owned or leased by the landowner, leaseholder or agent; (d) to persons lawfully hunting, fishing or trapping; or (e) a landowner, agricultural leaseholder or a designated agent in the act of searching for or retrieving escaped livestock or pets. Any person convicted under this provision shall be guilty of harassment of wildlife and shall be punished by a fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than sixty (60) days nor more than six (6) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5866-02; Laws, 1956, ch. 149, § 3; Laws, 1971, ch. 314, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 430, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 556; Laws, 1985, ch. 452, § 6; Laws, 1991, ch. 365, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 589, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 354, § 2; Laws, 2005, ch. 522, § 2; Laws, 2007, ch. 531, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 49-7-96.
Deer management zones; antler restrictions.

The Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks may establish deer management zones within the state.

The commission may establish antler restrictions within the zones for the proper management of antlered deer.

The antler restrictions in Sections 49-7-31 and 49-7-41 shall not apply to those zones with antler restrictions established by the commission.

If the commission establishes deer management zones or establishes antler restrictions, the department shall study and analyze all relevant data and shall file annual progress reports with the Legislature. The department shall file a final report on the effectiveness of the program with recommendations on the continuation of such restrictions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 600, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 365, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 49-7-97.
Liability of public officer for failure to perform duty.

Any public officer who wilfully fails to perform any duty imposed by law or by any lawful rule or regulation of the commission, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or be imprisoned not more than six (6) months, or both.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5866-03; Laws, 1956, ch. 149, § 4; Laws, 1994, ch. 408, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 49-7-99.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1998, ch. 409, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 24, 1998).

[Codes, 1942, § 5903.5; Laws, 1964, ch. 340, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1971, ch. 316, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved February 8, 1971)]

§ 49-7-101.
General fines and penalties.

Unless a different or other penalty or punishment is specially prescribed, a person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter or any law or regulation for the protection of wild animals, birds, or fish, or who fails to perform any duty imposed by such laws or regulations, or who violates or fails to comply with any lawful order, rule or regulation adopted by the commission is guilty of a Class III violation and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) nor more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00). In addition thereto, such person is liable, in the discretion of the court, to an additional penalty of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for each animal, bird, or fish, or part thereof, or each nest or egg of any bird taken, possessed, or transported in violation of such law or regulation.

Any person unlawfully killing a doe deer is guilty of a Class II violation and shall be punished as provided in Section 49-7-143.

Any person killing a wild turkey hen, except when permitted by the commission is guilty of a Class II violation and shall be punished as provided in Section 49-7-143.

Any person killing any turkey out of season, and any person baiting turkeys is guilty of a Class II violation and shall be punished as provided in Section 49-7-143.

Any person unlawfully trapping quail or any other game bird within this state is guilty of a Class II violation and shall be punished as provided in Section 49-7-143.

Any person transporting, shipping, or carrying quail or any other game bird within, or from within to a point without this state, without first having secured permission from the executive director to so do, shall, except as otherwise provided by Section 49-1-1 et seq., be fined not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5866; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1936, ch. 197; Laws, 1942, ch. 250; Laws, 1948, ch. 255, § 4; Laws, 1956, ch. 149, § 1; Laws, 1962, ch. 187; Laws, 1971, ch. 313, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 452, § 18; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 70, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-7-102.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1990, ch. 329, § 10, eff from and after October 1, 1990.

[En, Laws, 1976, ch. 383, § 1]

§ 49-7-103.
Seizure and confiscation of property used in illegal hunting or fishing, etc., as contraband.

The following property is subject to forfeiture: any firearm, equipment, appliance, conveyance or other property used directly or indirectly in the hunting or catching or capturing or killing of deer at night with any headlight, lighting device or light amplifying device, or in fishing for, or killing or capturing fish by using a telephone, magneto, battery, or any other electrically operated device including but not limited to any all-terrain vehicle, trailer, boat, outboard motor, airplane, net, light, battery, magneto, wires, telephone device, or any other device or contrivance or other vehicle, or which may be used in the transportation of any dead or live deer taken, captured, or killed at night with or by means of a headlight, lighting device or light amplifying device, or any dead or live fish killed, stunned, captured, or taken by using a telephone, battery, magneto, or any other electrically operated device. No motor vehicle that is of the type required to be titled under the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Title Law is subject to forfeiture. Property subject to forfeiture shall be seized by any employee of the department or other officer of the law including any sheriff or deputy sheriff. Upon the seizure of such property proceedings shall be instituted pursuant to Sections 49-7-251 through 49-7-257.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5866-04; Laws, 1956, ch. 149, § 5; Laws, 1989, ch. 468, § 5; Laws, 1995, ch. 551, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 589, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1998).

§§ 49-7-105 through 49-7-131.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1989, ch. 468, § 6, eff from and after March 28, 1989.

§49-7-105. [Codes, 1942, § 5866-05; Laws, 1956, ch. 149, § 6; Laws, 1964, ch. 228, § 1; Am Laws, 1981, ch. 471, § 50; Laws, 1982, ch. 423, § 28]

§49-7-107 through §49-7-131. [Codes, 1942, §§ 5866-06 through 5866-18; Laws, 1956, ch. 149, §§ 7-19]

§ 49-7-133.
Reciprocity agreement recognizing hunting and fishing licenses issued by participating states.

The commission may negotiate with the Louisiana Conservation Commission and the Arkansas Game and Fish Commission to effectuate a reciprocity agreement with one or both of these commissions providing that the hunting and fishing licenses and the rules and regulations governing hunting and fishing shall be acceptable and recognized by the game and fish commissions or the conservation commission of each of the states participating in the reciprocity agreement, when hunters or fishermen hold a current license issued by the state game and fish commissions or the conservation commission of the state in which he is domiciled, when fishing in the Mississippi River or in bodies of water between the Mississippi River and the levee nearest the river, in places where there is a levee; and in the Mississippi River or in lakes formed by the Mississippi River, or in old Mississippi River runs in places where there is no levee; and when hunting waterfowl and other migratory species in the Mississippi River, or between the Mississippi River and the levee nearest the Mississippi River, or in the Mississippi River or in lakes formed by the Mississippi River, or in old Mississippi River runs in places where there is no levee.

For all counties lying wholly or partially within the Mississippi levee district, and bordering upon the Mississippi River, and having a population of more than five thousand (5,000) according to the 1950 census, the commission is authorized to effectuate a reciprocity agreement, with the Game and Fish Commissions of Arkansas and Louisiana, and/or with the Game and Fish Commissions of the Counties of Desha and Chicot in the State of Arkansas, which shall permit hunting waterfowl and other migratory species, deer, squirrels, turkeys, quail and rabbits in the Mississippi River, or between the Mississippi River and the levee nearest the Mississippi River, or in the Mississippi River or in lakes formed by the Mississippi River, or in old Mississippi River runs and in places where there is no levee.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5911.5; Laws, 1948, ch. 253; Laws, 1954, ch. 173, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 71, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-7-135.
Compact concerning Pearl River authorized.

The executive director may proceed immediately to negotiate with the Game and Fish Commission of the State of Louisiana to effectuate a reciprocity agreement with such commission providing that the current hunting and fishing licenses issued to hunters or fishermen of the respective states shall be accepted and recognized by the game and fish commissions of each of the states for the purpose of hunting for migratory water fowl or fishing by the hunters or fishermen of either state in the Pearl River between top bank and top bank along the course where the Pearl River forms a boundary line between the State of Louisiana and the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5912; Laws, 1942, chs. 248, 249; Laws, 1952, ch. 187, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 72, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-7-137.
Lease of certain state lands for hunting, fishing and conservation purposes.

The Department of Finance and Administration may lease for hunting, fishing and conservation purposes to the Quitman County Conservation League, Incorporated, a nonprofit domestic corporation, all wood lands owned by the State of Mississippi in Quitman County, Mississippi, and being a part of Camp “B” at the O’Keefe Farm of the Mississippi State Penitentiary.

Any such lease shall be for a period and term of not more than one (1) year, but the same may continue from year to year until terminated by one (1) of the parties thereto.

Any such lease shall be upon such terms and conditions as may be imposed by the Department of Finance and Administration and the Board of Commissioners of the Mississippi State Penitentiary and the same shall have no force and effect until approved in writing by said board of commissioners and may be terminated at the pleasure of the board of commissioners, or the Department of Finance and Administration.

Such lease shall provide that the use of such wood lands by the Quitman County Conservation League, Incorporated, shall be under the supervision of the commission. Any lease on this land shall provide that any citizen of this state shall be entitled to hunt and fish on these lands providing they shall comply with all laws and regulations pertaining to fishing and hunting and provided such person meets the membership qualifications and pays the membership fee in the amount of Three Dollars ($3.00) as set by the Quitman County Conservation League.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5923.5; Laws, 1959, Ex Sess., ch. 26; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 73, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-7-139.
Seafoods excluded.

This chapter shall in no way abridge, affect or repeal any of the statutes, laws, or acts relating to or having reference to seafoods, oysters, saltwater fish, saltwater shrimp, diamond back terrapin, sea turtle, crabs or any other species of marine or saltwater animal life existing or living in the waters within the territorial jurisdiction of the State of Mississippi as set out in and covered by Chapter 15 of Title 49 of the Mississippi Code of 1972. None of the duties conferred on the Mississippi Commission on Marine Resources under Chapter 15 of Title 49 shall be conferred upon or exercised in any way by the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5907; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 58, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 49-7-140.
Importation, release and transportation of wild hogs; prohibition; permit; penalties.

No person may import into the state or release into the wild, any live feral hog, wild swine or Russian Boar.

No person may transport on public roads or off of the property of record where captured or relocate within the state any live feral hog, wild swine or Russian Boar, except as permitted by the department.

For the purposes of this section, “feral hogs, wild swine or Russian Boar” are defined as any hog that is not a domesticated pet or livestock.

A violation of this section is a Class I violation punishable as provided in Section 49-7-141.

Wild hogs may be caught or trapped and transported within the State of Mississippi, with a permit, issued by the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks. Wild hogs may not be released or removed alive from any mobile device or vehicle, except that wild hogs may be released alive for the purpose of slaughter into an enclosure no larger than five hundred (500) square feet in size and constructed in a manner that prevents the escape of any wild hog, or to a facility where the hog may be immediately prepared for slaughter. The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations for the issuance of a hog transportation permit consistent with this subsection, provided that the authority to issue such a permit is based on the determination that the individuals, at the time of requesting such permit:

Does not have a history of repeat hunting offenses; or

Has not had his or her hunting privileges revoked.

Any person transporting a live wild hog within the State of Mississippi must first obtain from the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, a live wild hog transportation permit, as provided above, for each wild hog being transported.

A violation of any regulation of the commission promulgated under the authority provided in this section shall be a Class I violation and punishable as provided in Section 49-7-141. In addition to the penalties provided therein, upon conviction, the violator shall forfeit all hunting, trapping and fishing privileges for a period of one (1) year from the date of conviction.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the lawful transport of domestic swine for customary and ordinary purposes of intrastate or interstate commerce, or agricultural practices.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 412, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 384, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 521, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 510, § 2; Laws, 2016, ch. 454, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 49-7-141.
Penalties; Class I violations.

Any person who has been convicted of a Class I violation shall be fined not less than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) and shall be imprisoned in the county jail for five (5) days. The person shall also forfeit all hunting, trapping and fishing privileges for a period of not less than twelve (12) consecutive months from the date of conviction.

In addition to the penalty provided in subsection (1) of this section, any person convicted of a violation of Section 49-7-51 or 49-7-53, Mississippi Code of 1972, may, in the discretion of the court, be fined One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for each game animal, game bird or game fish, or part thereof, bought, sold, offered for sale, exchanged for merchandise or other consideration, received for shipment, shipped, transported, carried or possessed with the intent to ship, transport or carry.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 452, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 359, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 551, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 49-7-143.
Penalties; Class II violations.

Any person who has been convicted of a Class II violation shall be punished by a fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than sixty (60) days nor more than six (6) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 452, § 7; Laws, 1989, ch. 359, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 49-7-145.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1994, ch. 578, § 65, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

[Laws, 1991, ch. 572, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 580, § 1]

§ 49-7-147.
Interference with lawful taking of wildlife.

No person shall intentionally:

Interfere with or attempt to prevent the lawful taking of wildlife by another;

Attempt to disturb wildlife, or attempt to affect their behavior with the intent to prevent their lawful taking by another; or

Harass another person who is engaged in the lawful taking of wildlife or in the preparation for such taking.

Any person who violates subsection (1) is guilty of a Class II violation, punishable as provided in Section 49-7-143, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 554 § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991).

§ 49-7-148.
Access for hunters with disabilities; use of mobility related device.

The department shall provide hunters with disabilities access to hunting areas in public wildlife management areas under its jurisdiction.

The department shall allow the use of a mobility related device for an individual who is permanently physically disabled and meets one or more of the following criteria:

Is paraplegic or hemiplegic;

Is unable to ambulate and requires a wheelchair, walker, leg braces, prosthesis, canes or crutches for mobility.

The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations for reasonable access and include a definition of “hunters with disabilities” as used in this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 481, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 413, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§§ 49-7-149 and 49-7-150.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1994, ch. 578, § 65, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§49-7-149. [Laws, 1992, ch. 357, § 1]

§49-7-150. [Laws, 1992, ch. 357, § 2]